Wisconsin, session 2025, SB535.
do enact as follows:SB535,11Section 1. 66.0443 of the statutes is created to read:SB535,2,3266.0443 Permitted uses of digital assets. (1) Definitions. In this 3section:SB535,2,44(a) “Digital asset” has the meaning given in s. 138.015 (1) (c).SB535,2,55(b) “Hardware wallet” has the meaning given in s. 138.015 (1) (d).SB535,2,66(c) “Political subdivision” means a city, village, town, or county.SB535,2,77(d) “Self-hosted wallet” has the meaning given in s. 138.015 (1) (f).SB535,2,108(2) Permitted uses of digital assets. A political subdivision may not 9prohibit, restrict, or otherwise impair the ability of a person to do any of the 10following:SB535,2,1111(a) Accept digital assets as a method of payment for legal goods and services.SB535,2,1312(b) Take custody of digital assets using a self-hosted wallet or hardware 13wallet.SB535,214Section 2. 138.015 of the statutes is created to read:SB535,3,11138.015 Digital assets. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB535,3,22(a) “Blockchain” means any technology where data is all of the following:SB535,3,431. Shared across a network to create a public ledger of verified transactions or 4information among network participants.SB535,3,652. Linked using cryptography to maintain the integrity of the public ledger 6and to execute other functions.SB535,3,973. Distributed among network participants in an automated fashion to 8concurrently update network participants on the state of the public ledger and any 9other functions.SB535,3,10104. Composed of source code that is publicly available.SB535,3,1211(b) “Blockchain protocol” means any executable software that is all of the 12following:SB535,3,16131. Deployed to a blockchain that facilitates the transfer of data and electronic 14records and allows that data to be broadcast to nodes, which blockchain may include 15an additional standardized set of rules that use a previously existing blockchain as 16a base.SB535,3,18172. Governed by a set of predefined rules that execute autonomously without 18human intervention but which can be altered by some predetermined mechanism.SB535,3,2019(c) “Digital asset" means any digital representation of value that is recorded 20on a cryptographically-secured distributed ledger or other similar technology.SB535,3,2421(d) “Hardware wallet" means a physical device that is not continuously 22connected to the Internet and that allows an individual to secure and transfer 23digital assets. “Hardware wallet" includes a physical device under which the owner 24of a digital asset retains independent control over the digital asset.SB535,4,31(e) “Node" means software run on a computer that does any of the following 2but that does not exercise discretion over transactions initiated by an end user of a 3blockchain protocol:SB535,4,541. Communicates with other devices or participants on a blockchain to 5maintain consensus and integrity of that blockchain.SB535,4,662. Creates and validates blocks of transactions.SB535,4,773. Contains and updates a copy of a blockchain.SB535,4,108(f) “Self-hosted wallet" means a digital interface that is used to secure and 9transfer digital assets and to retain independent control over the secured digital 10assets by the owner of the digital assets.SB535,4,1411(g) “Staking" means the act of committing or locking a digital asset to support 12the security and operations of a blockchain protocol that uses a proof-of-stake 13consensus mechanism by either operating a validator node or delegating the digital 14asset to a validator.SB535,4,1515(h) “State agency” has the meaning given in s. 16.004 (15) (a).SB535,4,1816(i) “Validate” means the process by which a blockchain protocol, through its 17consensus mechanism, confirms the authenticity and accuracy of transactions or 18other data entries which are then recorded on a blockchain protocol.SB535,4,2019(2) Permitted uses of digital assets. (a) A state agency may not prohibit, 20restrict, or otherwise impair the ability of a person to do any of the following:SB535,4,21211. Accept digital assets as a method of payment for legal goods and services.SB535,4,22222. Take custody of digital assets using a self-hosted wallet or hardware wallet.SB535,4,2323(b) A person in this state may do any of the following:SB535,5,211. Operate a node for the purpose of connecting to a blockchain protocol and 2participating in the blockchain protocol’s operations.SB535,5,332. Develop software on a blockchain protocol.SB535,5,443. Transfer digital assets to another person utilizing a blockchain protocol.SB535,5,554. Participate in staking on a blockchain protocol.SB535,36Section 3. 217.03 (1) (p) of the statutes is created to read:SB535,5,77217.03 (1) (p) 1. In this paragraph:SB535,5,88a. “Blockchain” has the meaning given in s. 138.015 (1) (a).SB535,5,119b. “Decentralized protocol” means a blockchain protocol software system 10governed by a set of predefined rules that execute autonomously without human 11intervention but which can be altered by some predetermined mechanism. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb535 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb535 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB535 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB535 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB535: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting